North Carolina statutes. Chapter 65. Cemeteries.
Article 9. North Carolina Cemetery Act.

§ 65-46.
Short title.

This Article 9 may be cited as “North Carolina Cemetery Act.”

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1.

§ 65-47.
Scope.

The provisions of this Article shall apply to all persons engaged in the business of operating a cemetery as defined herein, except cemeteries owned and operated by governmental agencies or churches.

Any cemetery beneficially owned and operated by a fraternal organization or its corporate agent for at least 50 years prior to September 1, 1975, shall be exempt from the provisions of Article 9 of this Chapter.

The provisions of this Article shall not apply to persons licensed under Article 13D of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes when engaging in activities for which a license is required under the Article.

Expired January 23, 2015.

A columbarium built in compliance with the requirements of former subsection (d) of this section is not subject to the provisions of Article 9 of this Chapter on or after January 23, 2015, as long as the columbarium (i) continues to exist on the grounds of a private, self-contained retirement community and (ii) continues to be reserved exclusively for the residents of that community.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1977, c. 686, s. 1; 1995, c. 509, s. 135.1(i); 2013-335, s. 1; 2014-115, s. 39.3(a).

§ 65-48.
Definitions.

As used in this Article, unless otherwise stated or unless the context or subject matter clearly indicates otherwise:

“Bank of belowground crypts” means any construction unit of belowground crypts acceptable to the Commission which a cemetery uses to initiate its belowground crypt program or to add to existing belowground crypt structures.

“Belowground crypts” consists of an interment space in preplaced chambers, either side by side or multiple depth, covered by earth and sod and are also known as lawn crypts, westminsters or turf top crypts.

“Cemetery” means any one or a combination of more than one of the following in a place used or to be used and dedicated or designated for cemetery purposes:

A burial park, for earth interment.

A mausoleum.

A columbarium.

“Cemetery broker” means a legal entity engaged in the business of arranging sales of cemetery products between legal entities and which sale does not involve a cemetery company, but does not mean funeral establishments or funeral directors operating under G.S. 90-210.25, when dealing between legal entities wherein one such entity shall be members of the family of a deceased person or other persons authorized by law to arrange for the burial and funeral of such deceased human being. The North Carolina Cemetery Act shall not apply to any cemetery broker selling less than five grave spaces per year.

“Cemetery company” means any legal entity that owns or controls cemetery lands or property and conducts the business of a cemetery, including all cemeteries owned and operated by governmental agencies, churches and fraternal organizations or their corporate agents for the duration of any sales and management contracts entered into with cemetery sales organizations or cemetery management organizations for cemetery purposes, or with any other legal entity other than direct employees of said governmental agency, church or fraternal organization.

“Cemetery management organization” means any legal entity contracting as an independent contractor with a cemetery company to manage a cemetery but does not mean individual managers employed by and contracting directly with cemetery companies operating under this Article.

“Cemetery sales organization” means any legal entity contracting with a cemetery which is exempt or not exempt under this Article to conduct sales of cemetery products, but does not mean individual salesmen or sales managers employed by and contracting directly with cemetery companies operating under this Article, nor does it mean funeral establishments or funeral directors operating under licenses authorized by G.S. 90-210.25 when dealing directly with a cemetery company and with members of the family of a deceased person or other persons authorized by law to arrange for the burial and funeral of such deceased human being.

“Columbarium” means a structure or building substantially exposed aboveground intended to be used for the interment of the cremated remains of a deceased person.

“Commission” means the North Carolina Cemetery Commission.

“Grave space” means a space of ground in a cemetery intended to be used for the interment in the ground of the remains of a deceased person.

“Human remains” or “remains” means the bodies of deceased persons, and includes the bodies in any stage of decomposition, and cremated remains.

“Mausoleum” means a structure or building substantially exposed aboveground intended to be used for the entombment of remains of a deceased person.

“Mausoleum section” means any construction unit of a mausoleum acceptable to the Commission which a cemetery uses to initiate its mausoleum program or to add to its existing mausoleum structures.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, joint venture, or association.

“Vault” means a crypt or underground receptacle which is used for interment in the ground and which is designed to encase and protect caskets or similar burial devices. For the purposes of this Article, a vault is a preneed item until delivery to the purchaser.

History.

1943, c. 644, s. 2; 1967, c. 1009, s. 2; 1971, c. 1149, s. 1; 1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1977, c. 686, ss. 2, 3.

§ 65-49.
The North Carolina Cemetery Commission.

The North Carolina Cemetery Commission is established with the power and duty to adopt rules and regulations to be followed in the enforcement of this Article.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1989, c. 751, s. 7(5); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 959, s. 19; 2012-120, s. 3(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-120, s. 3(a), effective June 28, 2012, substituted “The North Carolina Cemetery Commission is established” for “There is hereby established in the Department of Commerce a North Carolina Cemetery Commission.”

§ 65-50.
Cemetery Commission; members, selection, quorum.

Membership. — The Cemetery Commission shall consist of nine members. The General Assembly shall appoint two members who own or manage or who have retired from owning or managing a cemetery in North Carolina, one of whom shall be recommended by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and one of whom shall be recommended by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The Governor shall appoint seven members as follows:

Two members who own or manage cemeteries in North Carolina.

Three members who are selected from six nominees submitted by the North Carolina Cemetery Association.

Two public members who have no financial interest in, and are not involved in management of, any cemetery or funeral related business.

Terms. — Four members of the initial Commission shall be appointed for a term to expire June 30, 1977, and three members shall be appointed for a term to expire June 30, 1976. At the end of the respective terms of office of the initial members of the Commission, their successors shall be nominated in the same manner, selected from the same categories and appointed for terms of four years and until their successors are appointed and qualified.

(b1)

Any vacancy shall be filled by the authority originally filling that position, except that any vacancy in appointments by the General Assembly shall be filled in accordance with

G.S. 120-122

.

Removal. — The appointing authority shall have the power to remove any member of the Commission appointed by that authority from office for misfeasance, malfeasance and nonfeasance according to applicable provisions of law.

Quorum. — A majority of the Commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Officers. — At the first meeting of the Commission held after September 1, 1975, the Commission shall elect one of its members as its chair and another as its vice-chair, both to serve through June 30 of the next following year. Thereafter, at its first meeting held on or after July 1 of each year, the Commission shall elect from its members a president, vice president, and secretary-treasurer with no two offices to be held by the same person. All officers shall serve a term of one year and shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1; 2001-486, s. 2.1; 2012-120, s. 3(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-120, s. 3(b), effective June 28, 2012, in the second sentence of subsection (a), inserted “who own or manage or who have retired from owning or managing a cemetery in North Carolina”; deleted the last sentence of subsection (b), which read: “Any appointment to fill a vacancy on the Commission created by the resignation, dismissal, death or disability of a member shall be for the balance of the unexpired term”; added subsection (b1); and rewrote subsection (e).

§ 65-51.
Principal office.

The principal office of the Commission shall be in the City of Raleigh, North Carolina. Notice of all regular and special meetings of the Commission shall be advertised 10 or more days in advance in at least three newspapers in North Carolina having inter-county circulation in the State. Each member of the Commission shall receive per diem and allowances in accordance with

G.S. 93B-5

. Members of the Commission and other employees required to attend and legal counsel to the Commission shall be entitled to actual expenses while attending regular or special meetings of the Commission held other than in Raleigh, North Carolina. All salaries, compensation, and expenses of the Commission shall be paid from funds coming to the Commission pursuant to this Article. In no case shall any salary, compensation, or other expense of the Commission be charged against the General Fund.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1; 2012-120, s. 3(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-120, s. 3(c), effective June 28, 2012, in the third sentence, substituted “G.S. 93B-5” for ‘G.S.138-5”; in the fourth sentence substituted “Members of the Commission and” for “The administrator of the Commission”; in the fifth sentence inserted “salaries, compensation, and”; and added the last sentence.

§ 65-52.
Regular and special meetings.

The Cemetery Commission shall meet at least once in each quarter and may hold special meetings at any time and place within the State at the call of the chairman or upon the written request of at least four members.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1.

§ 65-53.
Powers.

In addition to other powers conferred by this Article, the Cemetery Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

To employ staff, including legal counsel, as may be necessary to perform its duties and determine the compensation of its employees.

To examine a cemetery company’s records when a person applies for a change of control of the company.

Investigate, upon its own initiative or upon a verified complaint in writing, the actions of any person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of a licensee under this Article. The license of a licensee may be revoked or suspended for a period not exceeding two years, or until compliance with a lawful order imposed in the final order of suspension, or both, where the licensee in performing or attempting to perform any of the acts specified in this Article has been guilty of:

Failing to pay the fees required herein;

Failing to make any reports required by this Article;

Failing to remit to the care and maintenance trust fund, merchandise trust fund, or preconstruction trust fund the required amounts;

Making any substantial misrepresentation;

Making any false statement of a character likely to influence or persuade;

A continued and flagrant course of misrepresentation or making of false promises through cemetery agents or salesmen;

Violating any provision of this Article or rule promulgated by the Commission; or

Any other conduct, whether of the same or a different character than specified in this section, which constitutes fraud or dishonest dealing.

To hold hearings in accordance with the provisions of this Article and Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes to subpoena witnesses and to administer oaths to or receive the affirmation of witnesses before the Commission.In any show cause hearing before the Commission held under the authority of Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes where the Commission imposes discipline against a licensee, the Commission may recover the costs, other than attorneys’ fees, of holding the hearing against all respondents jointly, not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

To apply to the courts, in its own name, for injunctive relief to prevent violations of this Article or violations of any rules adopted pursuant to this Article. Any court may grant injunctive relief regardless of whether criminal prosecution or any other action is instituted as a result of the violation. A single violation is sufficient to invoke the injunctive relief under this subdivision. In any such action, an order or judgment may be entered awarding such temporary or permanent injunction as may be deemed proper; provided, that before any such action is brought the Commission shall give the cemetery at least 20 days’ notice in writing, stating the alleged violation and giving the cemetery an opportunity within the 20-day period to cure the violation. In addition to all other means provided by law for the enforcement of a temporary restraining order, temporary injunction, or permanent injunction, the court shall have the power and jurisdiction to impound and to appoint a receiver for the property and business of the defendant, including books, papers, documents, and records appertaining thereto or so much thereof as the court may deem reasonably necessary to prevent further violation of this Article through or by means of the use of said property and business. The Commission may institute proceedings against the cemetery or its officers, whereafter an examination, pursuant to this Article, a shortage in the care and maintenance trust fund, merchandise trust fund or mausoleum and belowground crypts preconstruction trust fund is discovered, to recover said shortage.

Whenever any special additional audit or examination of a licensee’s premises, facilities, books or records is necessary because of the failure of the licensee to comply with the requirements imposed in this Article or by the rules and regulations of the Commission, to charge a fee based on the cost of the special examination or audit, taking into consideration the salary of any employees involved in the special audit or examination and any expenses incurred.

To promulgate rules and regulations requiring licensees to file with the Commission plans and specifications for the minimum quality of any product sold. The sale of any product for which plans and specifications required by the rules and regulations have not been filed or sale of any product of a lesser quality than the plans and specifications filed with the Commission is a violation of this Article.

When the Commission finds that failure by a licensee to maintain a cemetery properly has caused that cemetery to be a public nuisance or a health or safety hazard, the Commission may bring an action for injunctive relief, against the responsible licensee, in the superior court of the county in which the cemetery or any part thereof is located.

To acquire, hold, rent, encumber, alienate, and otherwise deal with real property in the same manner as a private person or corporation, subject only to approval of the Governor and Council of State. Collateral pledged by the Commission for an encumbrance is limited to the assets, incomes, and resources of the Commission.

To purchase, rent, or lease equipment and supplies and purchase liability insurance to cover the activities of the Commission, its operations, or its employees.

History.

1943, c. 644, s. 17; 1971, c. 1149, s. 8; 1973, c. 732, s. 2; 1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1977, c. 686, ss. 4-6; 1979, c. 888, ss. 1-3; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1153; 1987, c. 488, s. 8; c. 827, s. 1; 1991, c. 653, s. 3; 2012-120, s. 3(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-120, s. 3(d), effective June 28, 2012, in subdivision (1), substituted “To employ staff, including legal counsel, as may be necessary to perform its duties and determine the compensation of its employees” for “The administrator shall be appointed by the Governor upon recommendation of the Cemetery Commission. The compensation of the administrator and such other personnel as is necessary to operate the Commission is subject to the provisions of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes of North Carolina. The Commission is authorized and empowered to employ such staff, including legal counsel, as may be necessary”; rewrote subdivision (4); in subdivision (5), deleted the first sentence, which read: “At such time as the Commission finds it necessary it may bring an action in the name of the State in the court of the county in which the place of business is located against such person to enjoin such person from engaging in or continuing such violation or doing any act or acts in furtherance thereof”, and added the first three sentences; in subdivision (7), substituted “To promulgate” for “Promulgate”; and added subdivisions (9) and (10).

§ 65-53.1.
Inspectors.

The Commission may appoint one or more agents who shall serve at the pleasure of the Commission and who shall have the title “Inspector of the North Carolina Cemetery Commission.”

To determine compliance with the provisions of this Article and regulations promulgated under this Article, inspectors may do the following:

Enter the office, establishment, or place of business in North Carolina of any cemetery broker, cemetery company, cemetery management organization, cemetery sales organization, or preneed sales licensee to inspect the records, office, establishment, or facility or to inspect the practice conducted or license of any licensee.

Inspect criminal and probation records of licensees and applicants for licenses under this Article to obtain evidence of their character.

Inspectors may serve papers and subpoenas issued by the Commission or any office or member thereof under authority of this Article and shall perform other duties prescribed or ordered by the Commission.

The Commission may prescribe an inspection form to be used by the inspectors in performing their duties.

Upon request by the Commission, the Attorney General of North Carolina shall provide the inspectors with appropriate identification cards signed by the Attorney General or his or her designated agent. In lieu of identification cards, the Commission may design and issue badges to inspectors.

History.

2012-120, s. 3(e).

§ 65-54.
Annual budget of Commission; collection of funds.

The Commission shall prepare an annual budget and shall collect the sums of money required for this budget from yearly fees and from any other sources provided in this Article. On or before July 1 of each year, each licensed cemetery shall pay a license fee to be set by the Commission in an amount not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600.00). In addition, each licensed cemetery shall pay to the Commission an inspection fee for each grave space, niche, or mausoleum crypt when the certificate of interment right is issued and shall pay a fee for each vault, belowground crypt, memorial, or opening and closing of a grave space that is included in a preneed cemetery contract. The inspection fee for each grave space, niche, or mausoleum crypt is payable when the certificate of interment right is issued and may not exceed four dollars ($4.00). The fee for each of the listed items that are included in a preneed cemetery contract is payable when the contract is made and may not exceed ten dollars ($10.00).

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1977, c. 686, s. 7; 1987, c. 488, s. 1; 1991, c. 653, s. 1; 2004-202, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-202, s. 1, effective August 17, 2004, substituted “six hundred dollars ($600.00)” for “three hundred dollars ($300.00)” in the second sentence; in the third sentence, substituted “when the certificate of interment right is issued” for “sold” and deleted “niche” preceding “belowground crypt” and “mausoleum crypt” preceding memorial; substituted “certificate of interment right is issued and may not exceed four dollars ($4.00)” for “item is sold and may not exceed two dollars ($2.00)” in the fourth sentence; substituted “ten dollars ($10.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00)” in the last sentence; and made related punctuation changes.

§ 65-54.1.
Commission records are confidential.

Records, papers, and other documents containing information collected or compiled by the Commission, its members, or employees as a result of a complaint, investigation, inquiry, or interview in connection with an application for license, or in connection with a license holder’s professional ethics and conduct, shall not be considered public records within the meaning of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. Any notice or statement of charges against a license holder or applicant, or any notice to a license holder or applicant of a hearing to be held by the Commission, is a public record even though it may contain information collected and compiled as a result of a complaint, investigation, inquiry, or interview conducted by the Commission. If any record, paper, or other document containing information collected and compiled by the Commission is admitted into evidence in a hearing held by the Commission, it shall then be a public record within the meaning of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

History.

2012-120, s. 3(f).

§ 65-55.
License; cemetery company.

No legal entity shall engage in the business of operating a cemetery company except as authorized by this Article and without first obtaining a license from the Commission.

Any legal entity wishing to establish a cemetery shall file a written application for authority with the Commission on forms provided by the Commission.

Upon receipt of the application and filing fee to be set by the Commission in an amount not to exceed one thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600), the Commission shall cause an investigation to be made to establish the following criteria for approval of the application:

The creation of a legal entity to conduct cemetery business, and its proposed financial structure.

A perpetual care trust fund agreement, with an initial deposit of not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and with a bank cashier’s check or certified check attached for the amount made payable to the trustee. The trust fund agreement must be executed by the applicant, accepted by the trustee, and conditional only upon approval of the application.

A plat of the land to be used for the cemetery, showing the location of the cemetery and the access roads to the cemetery.

Designation by the legal entity wishing to establish a cemetery of a general manager. The general manager must be a person of good moral character and have at least one year’s experience in cemeteries.

Development plans sufficient to ensure the community that the cemetery will provide adequate cemetery services and that the property is suitable for use as a cemetery.

The Commission, after receipt of the investigating report, shall grant or refuse to grant the authority to organize a cemetery based upon the criteria set forth in G.S. 65-55(c).

If the Commission intends to deny an application, it shall give written notice to the applicant of its intention to deny. The notice shall state a time and a place for a hearing before the Commission and a summary statement of the reasons for the proposed denial. The notice of intent shall be mailed by certified mail to the applicant at the address stated in the application at least 15 days prior to the scheduled hearing date. The applicant shall pay the costs of this hearing as assessed by the Commission unless the applicant notifies the Commission by certified mail at least five days prior to the scheduled hearing date that a hearing is waived. Any appeals from the Commission’s decision shall be to the court having jurisdiction of the applicant or the Commission.

If the Commission intends to grant the authority, it shall give written notice that the authority to organize a cemetery has been granted and that a license to operate will be issued upon the completion of the following:

Establishment of the care and maintenance trust fund and receipt by the Commission of a certificate from the trust company, certifying receipt of the initial deposit required under this Article.

Full development, ready for burial, of not less than two acres including a completed paved road from a public roadway to said developed section, certified by inspection of the Commission or its representative.

A description, by metes and bounds, of the acreage tract of such proposed cemetery, together with evidence, by title insurance policy or by certificate of an attorney-at-law, certifying that the applicant is the owner in fee simple of such tract of land, which must contain not less than 30 acres, and that the title to not less than 30 acres is free and clear of all encumbrances. In counties with a population of less than 35,000 population according to the latest federal decennial census the tract need be only 15 acres.

A plat of the cemetery showing the number and location of all lots surveyed and permanently staked for sale.

History.

1943, c. 644, s. 9; 1957, c. 529, s. 3; 1967, c. 1009, s. 9; 1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1977, c. 686, s. 8; 1987, c. 488, s. 2; 1991, c. 653, s. 2; 2004-202, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-202, s. 2, effective August 17, 2004, substituted “to be set by the Commission in an amount not to exceed one thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600)” for “of eight hundred dollars ($800.00)” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (c).

§ 65-56.
Existing companies; effect of Article.

Existing cemetery companies at the time of the adoption of this Chapter shall continue in full force and effect and be granted a license but shall hereafter be operated in accordance with the provisions of Article 9 of this Chapter.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1.

§ 65-57.
Licenses for sales organizations, management organizations and brokers.

No legal entity shall engage in the business of a cemetery sales organization, a cemetery management organization or a cemetery broker except as authorized by this Article, and without first obtaining a license from the Commission.

Any legal entity wishing to establish and operate the business of a cemetery sales organization, a cemetery management organization or a cemetery broker shall file a written application for authority with the Commission on forms provided by the Commission which must contain such of the following documents and information as may be required by the Commission:

The appointment of a North Carolina resident to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal proceedings arising under this Chapter against the applicant, its principal owners, principal stockholders, directors and general manager or their personal representatives.

The states or other jurisdictions in which the applicant presently is conducting the business activity applied for or other similar businesses and any adverse order, judgment or decree entered against the applicant in each jurisdiction or by any court.

The applicant’s name, address and the form, date and jurisdiction of the organization and the address of each of its offices within or without this State.

The name, address, principal occupation for the past five years of every director and officer of the applicant or person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions.

Copies of the articles of incorporation or articles of partnership or joint venture agreement or other instrument establishing the legal entity of the applicant.

The application shall be accompanied by an initial filing fee to be set by the Commission in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for cemetery sales organization and cemetery management organization and an initial filing fee to be set by the Commission in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) for a cemetery broker. If ninety percent (90%) or more of the applicant is owned by an existing cemetery company operating under the North Carolina Cemetery Act, then the initial filing fee shall be one half of the sums set out herein. On or before July 1 of each year, each licensed cemetery sales organization, cemetery management organization, or cemetery broker shall pay a license renewal fee to be set by the Commission in an amount not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600.00) per year.

Upon receipt of the application and filing fee, the Commission shall cause an investigation to be made of the legal entity to conduct the business applied for and the qualification of said legal entity to do business in North Carolina.

The Commission, after receipt of the investigation report, shall grant or refuse to grant the authority to organize the organization applied for after it determines that the applicant possesses good character and general fitness or, in the case of a business association, employs and is directed by personnel of good character and general fitness.

If the Commission intends to deny an application, it shall give written notice to the applicant of its intention to deny. The notice shall state a time and a place for hearing before the Commission and a summary statement of the reasons for the proposed denial. The notice of intent shall be mailed by certified mail to the applicant at the address stated in the application at least 15 days prior to the scheduled hearing date. Any appeals from the Commission’s decision shall be to the court having jurisdiction of the applicant, or in the event of an out-of-state applicant, then to the court having jurisdiction of the Commission.

If the Commission intends to grant the authority, it shall give written notice that the authority to organize the business applied for has been granted and that a license to operate will be issued upon presentment to the Commission of a statement of employment between the applicant and the cemetery or cemeteries to be serviced thereby.

Any person or any cemetery sales organization or any cemetery management organization or any cemetery broker violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, and shall be subject to revocation of the license to operate.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1977, c. 686, ss. 9, 10; 1993, c. 539, s. 500; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2004-202, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-202, s. 3, effective August 17, 2004, in subsection (c), in the first sentence, substituted “to be set by the Commission in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “of four hundred dollars ($400.00)” and “to be set by the Commission in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00)” for “of two hundred dollars ($200.00),” and substituted “to be set by the Commission in an amount not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600.00)” for “of one hundred dollars ($100.00)” in the last sentence.

§ 65-58.
Licenses for persons selling preneed grave space.

No person shall offer to sell preneed grave spaces, mausoleum crypts, niches, memorials, vaults or any other preneed cemetery merchandise or services under any plan authorized for any cemetery, cemetery sales group, or cemetery management group, before obtaining a license from the Commission.

Persons wishing to obtain a license shall file a written application with the Commission on forms provided by the Commission. The Commission may require such information and documents as it deems necessary to protect the public interest.

The application shall be accompanied by a filing fee to be set by the Commission in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) to cover the expenses of processing and investigation. After processing and investigation, the Commission shall grant, or refuse to grant, the license applied for. The license fee for a two-year term shall be set by the Commission but shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00).

If the Commission refuses to grant the license applied for, it shall give written notice to the applicant. The notice shall state a time and a place for hearing before the Commission, and a summary statement of the reasons for the refusal to grant the license. The notice shall be mailed by registered mail or certified mail to the applicant at the address stated in the application at least 30 days prior to the scheduled hearing date.

If the Commission intends to grant the license, it shall give written notice that the license will be issued upon presentment to the Commission of a duly executed statement of employment between the applicant and the cemetery or cemeteries to be serviced thereby.

The provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes of North Carolina relating to “Judicial Review” shall apply to appeals or petitions for judicial review by any person or persons aggrieved by an order or decision of the Commission.

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 686, s. 12.

History.

1943, c. 644, s. 15; 1967, c. 1009, s. 14; 1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1977, c. 686, ss. 11, 12; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 2004-202, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-202, s. 4, effective August 17, 2004, in subsection (c), substituted “to be set by the Commission in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00)” for “of fifteen dollars ($15.00)” in the first sentence, substituted “license fee for a two-year term” for “annual license fee” and “one hundred dollars ($100.00)” for “ten dollars ($10.00)” in the last sentence, and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 65-59.
Application for a change of control; filing fee.

A person who proposes to acquire control of an existing cemetery company, whether by purchasing the capital stock of the company, purchasing an owner’s interest in the company, or otherwise acting to effectively change the control of the company, shall first make application on a form supplied by the Commission for a certificate of approval of the proposed change of control. The application shall contain the name and address of each proposed new owner. The Commission shall issue a certificate of approval only after it determines that the proposed new owners are qualified by character, experience, and financial responsibility to control and operate the cemetery company in a legal and proper manner, and that the interest of the public generally will not be jeopardized by the proposed change in control. An application for approval of a change of control must be completed and accompanied by a filing fee to be set by the Commission in an amount not to exceed one thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600). The Commission shall not approve any change of control until the applicant has provided sufficient evidence that any trust account required under G.S. 65-66(b) and G.S. 65-70(b) is maintained and funded in the required amount. If the cemetery company posted a performance bond in lieu of any trust account required under G.S. 65-66(b) and G.S. 65-70(b), then the Commission shall not approve any change of control until the applicant has provided sufficient evidence that the performance bond is being appropriately maintained and in an amount sufficient to cover all payments made directly or indirectly by or on account of purchasers who have not received the purchased property and services.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1987, c. 488, s. 4; 1991, c. 653, s. 4; 2004-202, s. 5; 2010-102, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-202, s. 5, effective August 17, 2004, substituted “to be set by the Commission in an amount not to exceed one thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600)” for “of two hundred dollars ($200.00)” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2010-102, s. 1, effective October 1, 2010, added the last two sentences.

§ 65-60.
Records.

A record shall be kept of every burial in the cemetery of a cemetery company, showing the date of burial, name of the person buried, together with lot, plot, and space in which such burial was made therein. All sales, trust funds, accounting records, and all other records of the licensee shall be available at the licensee’s principal place of business in this State and shall be readily available at all reasonable times for examination by an authorized representative of the Commission.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1.